Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1227
Bridge commission; members; term; vacancies; compensation; officers and employees; office; powers and duties.

When it has been determined by the governing body of any such city, by resolution or ordinance in the exercise of its discretion, that in the exercise of the powers conferred by sections 14-1201 to 14-1252, it is expedient to create a bridge commission, the mayor of such city, with the approval of the governing body of the city, shall appoint four persons, who, with the mayor, ex officio, shall constitute a bridge commission which shall be a public body corporate and politic under the name of (insert name of city) bridge commission. It shall have power to contract, to sue and be sued, and to adopt a seal and alter same at pleasure, but shall not have power to pledge the credit or taxing power of the city. No officer or employee of said city, except the mayor thereof, whether holding a paid or unpaid office shall be eligible to hold an appointment on said commission. Such appointees shall be originally appointed for terms of four years. Upon the expiration of such terms, appointments shall be made in like manner except that the term of the four appointees shall be for one year, two years, three years and four years, respectively. Not more than two of such appointees shall be members of the same political party. Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. Said commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from its members, and a secretary and treasurer who need not be a member of such commission. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation and shall give such bonds as may be required from time to time by the governing body of the city. The commission shall fix the compensation of the secretary and treasurer. The commission shall have power to establish bylaws, rules, and regulations for its own government and to make and enter into all contracts or agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers. The commission may employ engineering, architectural, and construction experts and inspectors and attorneys, and such other employees as may be necessary in its opinion, and fix their compensation, all of whom shall do such work as the commission shall direct. All salaries and compensation shall be obligations against and be paid solely from funds provided under the authority of sections 14-1201 to 14-1252. The office, records, books and accounts of the bridge commission shall always be maintained in the city which the commission represents. Such commission may be charged by the governing body of the city with the construction of new bridges or the operation, maintenance, repair, renewal, reconstruction, replacement, extension or enlargement of existing bridges, or bridges hereafter constructed.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 13, p. 622;

C.S.1929, § 14-1213;

R.S.1943, § 14-1227.